Utah statutes.
56-2-4.   Enforcement of provisions.

The Department of Transportation shall investigate and the Public Service Commission of Utah is hereby required to enforce the provisions of this act, within their respective jurisdictions, and for such purposes are hereby authorized to employ such necessary officials, investigators and inspectors as shall be necessary to provide for the enforcement thereof. And said commission and department are hereby empowered to prescribe the salaries and duties of such officers, investigators and inspectors.

